District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.19

Misrepresentation in insurance application.

(a)

No person shall make false or fraudulent statements or representations on, or relative to, an application for an insurance policy for the purpose of obtaining a fee, commission, money, or other benefit from a provider or individual person.

(b)

No person shall cause to be presented a false or fraudulent claim, or proof in support of a claim, for the payment of the loss upon a contract of insurance or prepare, make, or subscribe a false or fraudulent account, certificate, affidavit, proof of loss, or other document or writing with the intent that it may be presented or used in support of a false or fraudulent claim.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 119, 48 DCR 1225